Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 16 State Officers
25-16-702. Representation of state agencies and officers generally — Employment of outside counsel.

The Attorney General shall be the attorney for all state officials, departments, institutions, and agencies. Whenever any officer or department, institution, or agency of the state needs the services of an attorney, the matter shall be certified to the Attorney General for attention.

All office work and advice for state officials, departments, institutions, and agencies shall be given by the Attorney General and his or her assistants, and no special counsel shall be employed or additional expense paid for those services.

If, in the opinion of the Attorney General, it shall at any time be necessary to employ special counsel to prosecute any suit brought on behalf of the state or to defend a suit brought against any official, board, commission, or agency of the state, the Attorney General, with the approval of the Governor, may employ special counsel. The compensation for the special counsel shall be fixed by the court where the litigation is pending, with the written approval of the Governor and the Attorney General. The Attorney General shall not enter into any contract for the employment of outside legal counsel without first seeking prior review by the Legislative Council.

If any official, department, institution, or agency of the state needs the service of an attorney and the Attorney General fails to render the service when requested in writing, then, upon the establishment of that fact, the Governor may appoint counsel to look after the matter or may authorize the employment of counsel by the officer, department, agency, or institution needing the services of an attorney.

Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be subject to indictment and upon conviction fined in any sum not less than two hundred dollars ($200) nor more than two thousand dollars ($2,000) and, upon proper proceedings, removed from office.

The Attorney General shall have authority to initiate civil lawsuits under all state and federal environmental protection statutes.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1991, No. 609, § 1, provided:

“It is the public policy of this state that vigorous efforts be made to protect our fragile environment. Recognizing that duties concerning protection of the environment have been assigned to several agencies of state government, it is found that to enhance efforts to protect the environment, authority for instituting civil suits to protect the environment in the courts of this state and of the United States should be placed in the office of the Attorney General.”

Acts 1991, No. 609, § 3, provided:

“This Act shall not be construed as superseding or impairing any legal authority currently vested with the Arkansas Department of Pollution Control and Ecology, nor shall this Act in any way affect programs delegated by federal agencies to the Arkansas Department of Pollution Control and Ecology.”

Cross References. Consumer Protection Division, §4-88-105.

Criminal extradition, duties of Attorney General, §16-94-204.

Duty to defend cities, towns, counties, §21-9-304.

Suits for recovery of state property and lands, §22-5-401.

Tax collection duties, §§26-26-1614,26-26-1704,26-26-1706.

Ark. L. Rev.

Katherine E. McDonald, Comment: “Pay to Sue” — Contingency-Fee Arrangements When Representing the State: A Review of Section 25-16-702 of the Arkansas Code, 66 Ark. L. Rev. 775 (2013).

Attorney general's office did not have an irreconcilable conflict of interest in representing the Arkansas Board of Architects where it also represented the State Board of Registration for Professional Engineers and Land Surveyors in disciplinary proceedings against engineers; the Attorney General was only representing the Board of Architects, not the Board of Engineering, and the latter board was in no way involved in this case. Holloway v. Ark. State Bd. of Architects, 352 Ark. 427, 101 S.W.3d 805 (2003).

Property owners'challenge to the Attorney General's representation was rejected where among those sued by the property owners were state agency employees, members of the licensing board, and the state attorney who advised the agencies.Watkins v. Ark. Dep't of Agric., 2018 Ark. App. 460, 560 S.W.3d 814 (2018).

The Attorney General can intervene in any suit involving any agency or department if his services are “necessary and desirable.” Parker v. Murry, 221 Ark. 554, 254 S.W.2d 468 (1953); Newton County v. West, 293 Ark. 461, 739 S.W.2d 141 (1987).

Attorney General was not entitled to intervene in proceeding for the purpose of defending state officer who was being defended by his own attorney in absence of showing that attorney was not efficiently representing officer. Parker v. Murry, 221 Ark. 554, 254 S.W.2d 468 (1953).

The chancery court lacked subject-matter jurisdiction to issue the writ of mandamus to restrain the counsel for the Arkansas Department of Finance and Administration from representing the State of Arkansas before the United States Supreme Court, the effect of which was to thwart the state's certiorari petition from being docketed in the Supreme Court. Barclay v. Farm Credit Servs., 340 Ark. 65, 8 S.W.3d 517 (2000).

Cited: Rodgers v. University of Ark. for Medical Sciences, 275 Ark. 139, 628 S.W.2d 11 (1982); Holloway v. State Bd. of Architects, 79 Ark. App. 200, 86 S.W.3d 391 (2002).

Automatic License Plate Reader System Act, §12-12-1801 et seq., provided for enforcement only through private actions for damages. While the Attorney General may intervene and defend the constitutionality of the Act in a private damages suit, the Attorney General does not initiate enforcement or seek relief against a putative defendant; thus, the companies'injury was “fairly traceable” only to the private civil litigants who may seek damages under the Act and the companies lacked standing to sue the Governor and Attorney General challenging the Act's constitutionality.Digital Recognition Network, Inc. v. Hutchinson, 803 F.3d 952 (8th Cir. 2015).

The chancery court lacked subject-matter jurisdiction to issue the writ of mandamus to restrain the counsel for the Arkansas Department of Finance and Administration from representing the State of Arkansas before the United States Supreme Court, the effect of which was to thwart the state's certiorari petition from being docketed in the Supreme Court. Barclay v. Farm Credit Servs., 340 Ark. 65, 8 S.W.3d 517 (2000).

Cited: Holloway v. State Bd. of Architects, 79 Ark. App. 200, 86 S.W.3d 391 (2002).

Cross References. State of Arkansas not to be made defendant in any of its courts, Ark. Const., Art. 5, § 20.

An injunction suit could not be transferred into an action of quo warranto or of information in the nature of quo warranto in the absence of intervention by the state through the Attorney General. Moody v. Lowrimore, 74 Ark. 421, 86 S.W. 400 (1905).

Cited: Ashcraft v. State, 141 Ark. 361, 222 S.W. 376 (1919).

Amendments. The 2011 amendment inserted “including criminal matters” in (a).

Ark. L. Rev.

Watkins, Access to Public Records under the Arkansas Freedom of Information Act, 37 Ark. L. Rev. 741.

Attorney General was authorized to advise settlement of state's claim against insolvent bank and letter of Attorney General authorizing settlement relieved the Treasurer and his surety from liability for having made the settlement. State ex rel. Smith v. Leonard, 192 Ark. 834, 95 S.W.2d 86 (1936).

Cited: Holloway v. State Bd. of Architects, 79 Ark. App. 200, 86 S.W.3d 391 (2002).

This section shall not be so construed as to repeal § 22-5-401.

Publisher's Notes. For text of section effective May 1, 2021, see the following version.

This section deals exclusively with special license fees, franchise taxes, privilege taxes or other moneys due the state and did not affect former provisions on tax evasion. Norphlet School Dist. v. El Dorado Special School Dist., 188 Ark. 875, 69 S.W.2d 400 (1934), dismissed, Norphlet School Dist. v. El Dorado School Dist., 293 U.S. 633, 55 S. Ct. 65 (1934).

There is no requirement that compensation of special counsel be assessed against the delinquent taxpayer in addition to the tax due, but the court may fix the compensation of the special counsel to be paid out of the amount recovered upon collection of such amount. Saint Louis S.W. Ry. v. Yates, 23 F.2d 283 (8th Cir. 1927).

Attorney General was authorized to advise settlement of state's claim against insolvent bank and letter of Attorney General authorizing the settlement relieved the Treasurer and his surety from liability for having made the settlement. State ex rel. Smith v. Leonard, 192 Ark. 834, 95 S.W.2d 86 (1936).

Cited: Rodgers v. University of Ark. for Medical Sciences, 275 Ark. 139, 628 S.W.2d 11 (1982).

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2019, No. 819, § 1, provided: “Title. This act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Arkansas Tax Reform Act of 2019’”.

Acts 2019, No. 819, § 2, provided:

“Legislative findings and intent.

“(a)The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)The Arkansas Tax Reform and Relief Legislative Task Force was charged with:

“(A)Examining and identifying areas of potential tax reform within the tax laws; and

“(B)Recommending legislation to the General Assembly, in part, to modernize and simplify the Arkansas tax code and ensure fairness to all taxpayers;

“(2)There are several areas of the tax code that should be amended to reform the state's tax laws to modernize and simplify the tax code and ensure fairness to all taxpayers; and

“(3)Any savings realized by the state through tax reforms should be dedicated to reducing the tax burden for Arkansas taxpayers.

“(b)It is the intent of the General Assembly to:

“(1)Reform Arkansas tax laws to modernize and simplify the tax code and ensure fairness to all taxpayers; and

“(2)Offset any revenue savings realized through tax reform with corresponding changes to reduce the tax burden for Arkansas taxpayers”.

Publisher's Notes. For text of section effective until May 1, 2021, see the preceding version.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment, in (a), deleted “franchise tax” preceding “privilege tax”, substituted “would be in” for “would be for”, substituted “Attorney General may appoint” for “Attorney General shall have the authority to appoint”, deleted “which shall be” following “take any steps”; and made stylistic changes.

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 819, § 26(a): May 1, 2021. Effective date clause provided: “Sections 3-17 and 20-24 of this act are effective on and after May 1, 2021”.

This section deals exclusively with special license fees, franchise taxes, privilege taxes or other moneys due the state and did not affect former provisions on tax evasion. Norphlet School Dist. v. El Dorado Special School Dist., 188 Ark. 875, 69 S.W.2d 400 (1934), dismissed, Norphlet School Dist. v. El Dorado School Dist., 293 U.S. 633, 55 S. Ct. 65 (1934).

There is no requirement that compensation of special counsel be assessed against the delinquent taxpayer in addition to the tax due, but the court may fix the compensation of the special counsel to be paid out of the amount recovered upon collection of such amount. Saint Louis S.W. Ry. v. Yates, 23 F.2d 283 (8th Cir. 1927).

Attorney General was authorized to advise settlement of state's claim against insolvent bank and letter of Attorney General authorizing the settlement relieved the Treasurer and his surety from liability for having made the settlement. State ex rel. Smith v. Leonard, 192 Ark. 834, 95 S.W.2d 86 (1936).

Cited: Rodgers v. University of Ark. for Medical Sciences, 275 Ark. 139, 628 S.W.2d 11 (1982).

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning biennial report by the Attorney General and reports from prosecuting attorneys, was repealed by Acts 1993, No. 1306, § 11. The section was derived from Acts 1911, No. 131, §§ 4, 6; C. & M. Dig., §§ 4524, 4525; Pope's Dig., §§ 5581, 5582; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-705, 12-706. For present law, see §16-21-145 et seq.

History.

Acts 1933, No. 14, §§ 1, 2, 5-7; Pope's Dig., §§ 5599, 5600, 5602-5604; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-701, 12-708 — 12-711; Acts 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 46, § 16; 1991, No. 609, § 2.

25-16-703. Representation of state interests in federal courts.

The Attorney General shall maintain and defend the interests of the state in matters before the United States Supreme Court and all other federal courts and shall be the legal representative of all state officers, boards, and commissions in all litigation where the interests of the state are involved.

Nothing in this section shall relieve the Attorney General of discharging any and all duties required of him or her under the common law or by any of the statutes of this state, nor shall it relieve the prosecuting attorneys of any duties required of them by the statutes of this state.

History.

Acts 1911, No. 131, §§ 2, 6; C. & M. Dig., §§ 4522, 4525; Pope's Dig., §§ 5579, 5582; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-706, 12-712.

25-16-704. Representation of state interests in Supreme Court — Writs of quo warranto.

The Attorney General shall attend the several sittings of the Supreme Court and shall maintain and defend the interests of the state in all matters before that tribunal.

He or she shall have full power to issue writs of quo warranto in all cases where the writs should properly issue.

If he or she shall fail to attend any term of the Supreme Court in which cases may be pending for or against the state, shall fail to prosecute or defend the cases, and shall fail to furnish a substitute, the court may appoint a substitute. The attorney so appointed shall receive, as a compensation for his or her services for attending any term of the court and prosecuting or defending the suits, the sum of two hundred dollars ($200), to be paid out of the salary of the Attorney General on the certificate of the court.

History.

Acts 1843, § 2, p. 117; 1857, § 6, p. 117; C. & M. Dig., §§ 4527, 4528; Pope's Dig., §§ 5584, 5585; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-713, 12-714.

25-16-705. Subpoena power — Attendance of witnesses.

In all litigation, including criminal matters, in which the interests of the State of Arkansas are involved or may become involved before any tribunal, board, or commission, the Attorney General shall have the right to subpoena any person or the books, records, or other documents being held by any person. He or she shall have the authority to administer oaths for the purpose of taking testimony of witnesses subpoenaed before him or her, which he or she may deem necessary to adequately present the state's case.

The subpoena provided for in subsection (a) of this section shall be substantially in the following form:

“The State of Arkansas to the Sheriff of
County: You are commanded to subpoena
to attend before the Attorney General at
on
, 20 , at
o'clock
M., and testify and/or produce the following books, records, or other documents, to wit:
in the matter of an investigation being conducted by the Attorney General in which the interests of the State of Arkansas are involved. WITNESS my hand this
day of
, 20 .
Attorney General By:
Assistant Attorney General”

Click to view form.

The subpoena provided for in subsection (a) of this section shall be served in the manner provided by law and returned and a record made and kept by the Attorney General. The fees and mileage of officers serving the subpoena, and of witnesses in answer to the subpoena, shall be as provided by law.

(1)The failure of any officer to serve such subpoena, and the failure of a witness to appear on the return date thereof, shall constitute a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than twenty-five dollars ($25.00) nor more than one hundred dollars ($100), by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed six (6) months, or both fine and imprisonment.

In addition to paying the penalty provided in subdivision (d)(1) of this section, any witness who fails to attend before the Attorney General at the time and place designated in the subpoena, or who refuses to testify or give evidence when he or she does attend, shall be cited on affidavit by the Attorney General to the Pulaski County Circuit Court or any other circuit court of the state where the subpoena was served and proceeded against. Such failure or refusal shall be punished by the court as if the witness had been subpoenaed to appear before the circuit court citing the person.

History.

Acts 1957, No. 91, §§ 1-5; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-725 — 12-729; Acts 2011, No. 170, § 1.

25-16-706. Opinions.

(1)Upon request, the Attorney General without fee or reward shall give his or her opinion to the Governor and to the heads of the executive departments of this state upon any constitutional or other legal question that may concern the official action of those officers.

When requested, he or she shall give his or her opinion to the prosecuting attorney of any district upon any legal question that concerns the financial interests of the state or any county and upon any question connected with the administration of the criminal laws of the state.

When requested, he or she shall also give his or her opinion to either house of the General Assembly and any member thereof upon the constitutionality of any proposed bill and to all state boards and commissions upon any question connected with the discharge of the duties of those boards and commissions.

The Attorney General is required to furnish to county boards of election commissioners an official opinion upon any inquiry submitted to him or her concerning the provisions of the election laws of this state.

All opinions shall be written when the inquiry is in writing and request is made for a written opinion.

(1)Whenever any real estate is bought for the State of Arkansas by any agency, department, board, or commission authorized to buy real estate, it shall be the duty of the seller of the property at the seller's own expense to provide a commitment to issue a title insurance policy acceptable to the agency, department, board, or commission.

Upon request, the Attorney General shall provide to the agency, department, board, or commission buying the property advice and counsel regarding the purchase of the property.

Nothing in subsections (a)-(d) of this section shall relieve the Attorney General of discharging any and all duties required of him or her under the common law or by any of the statutes of this state or relieve the prosecuting attorneys of any duties required of them by the statutes of this state.

History.

Acts 1843, § 2, p. 117; 1857, § 3, p. 117; 1893, No. 145, § 5, p. 251; 1911, No. 131, §§ 1, 3, 6; C. & M. Dig., §§ 4521, 4523, 4525, 4526; Pope's Dig., §§ 5578, 5580, 5582, 5583; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-702 — 12-704, 12-706; Acts 2001, No. 534, § 1.

25-16-707. Amounts due state to be certified to Attorney General.

Within ten (10) days after any amount of money is due and payable to the state, the official, department, institution, or other agency through which the amount is payable shall certify that fact to the Attorney General for his or her attention.

Any person violating the provisions of this section shall be subject to indictment and upon conviction fined in any sum not less than two hundred dollars ($200) nor more than two thousand dollars ($2,000) and, upon proper proceedings, removed from office.

History.

Acts 1933, No. 14, §§ 3, 7; Pope's Dig., § 5601; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-711, 12-718.

25-16-708. Appointment of special counsel to collect moneys due state. [Effective until May 1, 2021.]

When there shall be past due and unpaid any special license fee, franchise tax, privilege tax, or other moneys due the state by individuals, officers, companies, firms, or corporations, and when in his or her judgment it would be for the best interest of the state to do so, the Attorney General shall have the authority to appoint special counsel to take any steps which shall be necessary for the collection of all those sums which are due and unpaid.

In all cases in which the Attorney General may appoint special counsel under the provisions of this section, the special counsel shall receive a reasonable compensation for his or her services, dependent on recovery, to be fixed by the Attorney General where collection is made without suit, and by the court or judge trying the cause where suits are instituted. The compensation shall in no case be more than twenty-five percent (25%) of the amount recovered.

The venue of all suits contemplated by the provisions of this section shall be in the circuit court of any county in Arkansas where legal service of summons can be made.

In cases in which the Attorney General deems it for the best interest of the state to do so, he or she is given authority to make any compromises of delinquent taxes or moneys, as herein described, as in his or her judgment shall secure for the state the most advantageous settlement.

All moneys collected under the provisions of this section, less the compensation of special counsel fixed under authority of subsection (b) of this section, shall be paid over promptly to the Treasurer of State, who shall issue his or her receipt therefor to the Attorney General.

History.

Acts 1923, No. 157, §§ 1-6; Pope's Dig., §§ 5593-5598; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-719 — 12-724.

25-16-708. Appointment of special counsel to collect moneys due state. [Effective May 1, 2021.]

When there is past due and unpaid any special license fee, privilege tax, or other moneys due the state by individuals, officers, companies, firms, or corporations, and when in his or her judgment it would be in the best interest of the state to do so, the Attorney General may appoint special counsel to take any steps necessary for the collection of all those sums that are due and unpaid.

In all cases in which the Attorney General may appoint special counsel under the provisions of this section, the special counsel shall receive a reasonable compensation for his or her services, dependent on recovery, to be fixed by the Attorney General where collection is made without suit, and by the court or judge trying the cause where suits are instituted. The compensation shall in no case be more than twenty-five percent (25%) of the amount recovered.

The venue of all suits contemplated by the provisions of this section shall be in the circuit court of any county in Arkansas where legal service of summons can be made.

In cases in which the Attorney General deems it for the best interest of the state to do so, he or she is given authority to make any compromises of delinquent taxes or moneys, as herein described, as in his or her judgment shall secure for the state the most advantageous settlement.

All moneys collected under the provisions of this section, less the compensation of special counsel fixed under authority of subsection (b) of this section, shall be paid over promptly to the Treasurer of State, who shall issue his or her receipt therefor to the Attorney General.

This section shall not be so construed as to repeal §22-5-401.

History.

Acts 1923, No. 157, §§ 1-6; Pope's Dig., §§ 5593-5598; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-719 — 12-724; Acts 2019, No. 819, § 14.

25-16-709. Suits against officers indebted to state.

The Attorney General is authorized and empowered, and it is made his or her duty, to institute and prosecute all suits in behalf of the state against all officers of the state who are indebted to the state by reason of any moneys collected or received and not accounted for according to law.

Suits against these officers may be brought in any county of this state, at the option of the Attorney General, except in cases wherein the prosecuting attorneys of the different judicial districts are expressly authorized by law to bring suit.

Whenever it shall become necessary to institute legal proceedings on the part of the state against defaulting or delinquent state officers, the Governor shall have the power to employ such competent attorneys at law as he or she may deem proper to assist the Attorney General in the proceedings and to pay a reasonable fee for the services rendered by them.

Whenever under the provisions of this section the Attorney General shall fail to bring suit against any officer in default or to investigate the books and accounts of any officer when there are reasonable grounds for believing that he or she is a defaulter, the Governor may employ some competent attorney to prosecute the action. The attorney shall be allowed a reasonable fee.

History.

Acts 1883, No. 45, §§ 1, 2, p. 68; 1883, No. 85, § 1, p. 154; C. & M. Dig., §§ 4529-4531; Pope's Dig., §§ 5586-5588; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 12-715 — 12-717.

25-16-710. [Repealed.]

In the event that the Attorney General and a constitutional officer disagree on the interpretation of any constitutional provision, act, rule, or regulation which affects the duties of that constitutional officer, the constitutional officer is authorized to employ special counsel to resolve the disagreement by litigation. This special counsel shall receive a reasonable compensation for his or her services.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 246, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-126.

25-16-712. Funding restriction.

The Attorney General shall not enter into any contract for the employment of outside legal counsel without first seeking prior review by the Legislative Council.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 557, § 19.

25-16-713. Attorney General — Designated law enforcement agency.

The office of the Attorney General is designated as a law enforcement agency.

A person designated and employed as a special investigator by the Attorney General shall:

Be a certified law enforcement officer under § 12-9-101 et seq.; and

Have statewide law enforcement jurisdiction and authority.

“State transparency website” means the website developed by the Department of Finance and Administration under the Arkansas Financial Transparency Act, § 25-1-401 et seq.

Whether there are sufficient and appropriate legal and financial resources within the Attorney General's office to handle the matter;

The time and labor required;

The novelty, complexity, and difficulty of the questions involved;

The skill required to perform the attorney services properly;

The geographic area in which the attorney services are to be provided; and

The amount of experience desired for the particular kind of attorney services to be provided and the nature of the private attorney's experience with similar issues or cases.

If the Attorney General makes a written determination under subsection (b) of this section, the Attorney General shall:

Draft a written request for proposals from private attorneys to represent the state on a contingency-fee basis; and

Post the request for proposals prominently on the Attorney General's website.

However, if the Attorney General determines that requesting proposals is not feasible under the relevant circumstances, he or she shall state the basis for this determination in writing and include the statement in the written determination required under subsection (b) of this section.

The Attorney General shall not enter into a contingency-fee contract that provides for the private attorney to receive an aggregate contingency fee, exclusive of reasonable costs and expenses, in excess of the sum of the following:

Twenty-five percent (25%) of any recovery up to ten million dollars ($10,000,000);

Twenty percent (20%) of any recovery between ten million dollars ($10,000,000) and fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000);

Fifteen percent (15%) of any recovery between fifteen million dollars ($15,000,000) and twenty million dollars ($20,000,000);

Ten percent (10%) of any recovery between twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) and twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000); and

Five percent (5%) of any recovery exceeding twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000).

An aggregate contingency fee shall not exceed fifty million dollars ($50,000,000), exclusive of reasonable costs and expenses, regardless of the number of lawsuits filed or the number of private attorneys retained to achieve the recovery.

A contingency fee shall not be based on penalties or civil fines awarded or any amounts attributable to penalties or civil fines.

The Attorney General shall not enter into a contingency fee contract unless the following requirements are met throughout the contract period and any extensions of the contract period:

The government attorneys shall retain complete control over the course and conduct of the case;

A government attorney with supervisory authority shall be personally involved in overseeing the litigation;

The government attorneys shall retain the authority to reject any decisions made by outside counsel;

A defendant that is the subject of the litigation may contact the lead government attorneys directly without having to confer with contingency fee counsel;

A government attorney with supervisory authority for the case shall attend all settlement conferences; and

Decisions regarding settlement of the case shall be left exclusively to the discretion of the government attorneys and the Attorney General.

The Attorney General shall develop a standard addendum to each contingency fee contract that shall be used in all cases and shall describe in detail the responsibilities of the contracted private attorney and the Attorney General, including without limitation the requirements under subsection (g) of this section.

This section does not expand the authority of the Attorney General to enter into a contract that the Attorney General does not otherwise have the authority to execute.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2015, No. 851, § 1, provided: “Title. This act shall be known as the ‘Transparency in Private Attorney Contracts Act’.”

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2015, No. 851, § 1, provided: “Title. This act shall be known as the ‘Transparency in Private Attorney Contracts Act’.”

Effective Dates. Acts 1967, No. 235, § 4: June 30, 1967. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that most of the affairs of this State are conducted by boards and commissions; that the activities of such boards and commissions vitally affect the public peace, health, safety and welfare; that the appointment of capable and qualified members of such boards and commissions is of vital importance for the proper discharge of duties imposed on such boards and commissions; that many appointments are now being made of persons who are not qualified for such positions; that confusion exists in the method of appointments of members of boards and commissions from congressional districts, and clarification of laws governing such appointments is immediately necessary; and, that only by the immediate passage of this Act may the same be corrected. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1969, No. 465, Art. 13, § 10: approved Apr. 17, 1969. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and declared by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the present election laws are ancient and outdated in part and have caused and are causing much confusion and controversy, that there are particular problem areas in the present law which need immediate legislation in order to resolve same, that elections are and will continue to be held and conducted in this atmosphere of confusion and controversy until these problem areas are resolved and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act shall be in force and effect from and after its passage.”

Acts 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1035, § 3: Jan. 27, 1976. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Seventieth General Assembly, meeting in Extended Session, that the standardization of mileage reimbursement for members of the State's Boards and Commissions will alleviate many discrepancies and inequities in existing laws and will allow such members to receive travel reimbursement commensurate with that paid to State employees. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1987, No. 862, § 3: Apr. 13, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that because of the case Ricarte v. State, CR 86-31, a question has arisen over the validity of Act 1035 of the Extended Session of 1976; that this Act is a reenactment of the former law; and that the immediate passage of this Act is necessary to clarify the state of the law on this issue. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after passage and approval.”

Acts 1993, No. 1251, § 8: Apr. 20, 1993. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that the Arkansas Supreme Court has ruled in a recent decision that there is no statutory procedure in place for the appointment of special Commissioners to decide matters which come before the State Highway Commission when Commissioners are disqualified; that it is unclear whether there is authority for the appointment of special members to other state commissions, boards, councils, committees, or similar bodies when members are disqualified or are otherwise unable or unwilling to participate in matters before the entities; that it is in the best interests of all persons concerned that specific authority be provided for the appointment of special members to hear and participate in the determination of matters before a state commission, board, council, committee, or similar body when the regular members are disqualified or are otherwise unable or unwilling to participate in matters before the entity; that this act is designed to accomplish this purpose and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1997, No. 250, § 258: Feb. 24, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that Act 1211 of 1995 established the procedure for all state boards and commissions to follow regarding reimbursement of expenses and stipends for board members; that this act amends various sections of the Arkansas Code which are in conflict with the Act 1211 of 1995; and that until this cleanup act becomes effective conflicting laws will exist. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

ALR.

Validity, construction, and effect of state statutes restricting political activities of public officers or employees. 51 A.L.R.4th 702.

Cross References. Congressional districts, §7-2-101 et seq.

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning mileage reimbursement, was repealed by Acts 1997, No. 250, § 237. The section was derived from Acts 1975 (Extended Sess., 1976), No. 1035, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 6-616; reen. Acts 1987, No. 862, § 1. For present law, see §25-16-901 et seq.

History.

Acts 2009, No. 81, § 1.

25-16-714. Procurement of contingency fee contracts — Definitions.

As used in this section:

“Government attorney” means an attorney employed by the state as a staff attorney in the Attorney General's office;

“Private attorney” means a private attorney or law firm; and

(1)The Attorney General shall not enter into a contingency fee contract with a private attorney unless the Attorney General makes a written determination before entering into the contingency fee contract that contingency fee representation is both cost effective and in the public interest.

A written determination made under this subsection shall state:

History.

Acts 2015, No. 851, § 2.

25-16-715. Transparency — Contingency fee contracts.

A copy of each executed contingency fee contract and the Attorney General's written determination to enter into a contingency fee contract with a private attorney shall be posted on the state transparency website for public inspection within five (5) business days after the date the contract is executed and shall remain posted on the state transparency website for the duration of the contingency fee contract, including any extensions of or amendments to the contingency fee contract.

Each payment of a contingency fee shall be posted on the state transparency website within fifteen (15) days after the payment of the contingency fee to the private attorney and shall remain posted on the state transparency website for at least one (1) year thereafter.

(1)A private attorney under contract to provide services to the Attorney General on a contingency-fee basis shall maintain, from the inception of the contract until at least four (4) years after the contract expires or is terminated, detailed current records, including without limitation documentation of all expenses, disbursements, charges, credits, underlying receipts and invoices, and other financial transactions that concern the provision of attorney services under the contingency fee contract.

The private attorney shall make the records maintained under this subsection available for inspection and copying by the Attorney General upon request in accordance with the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, §25-19-101 et seq.

A private attorney shall maintain detailed contemporaneous time records for the attorneys and paralegals working on the matter in increments of no greater than one-tenth (1/10) of an hour and shall promptly provide these records to the Attorney General upon request.

(1)By February 1 of each year, the Attorney General shall submit a report to the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of Representatives describing the use of contingency fee contracts with private attorneys in the preceding calendar year.

The Attorney General may take reasonable steps to protect the evidentiary privileges of the state when producing the report required under this subsection.

At a minimum, the report required under this subsection shall:

Identify all new contingency fee contracts entered into during the year and all previously executed contingency fee contracts that remain current during any part of the year, including the following information:

The name of the private attorney with whom the Attorney General has contracted, including the name of the attorney's law firm;

The nature and status of the legal matter;

The names of the parties to the legal matter;

The amount of any recovery; and

The amount of any contingency fee paid; and

Include copies of any written determinations made under §25-16-714 during the year.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 851, § 2.